Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle E. Registration Records.

§ 23-15-111.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-111. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-23 [Codes, 1942, § 3209.9; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 29, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-113.
Contents of voter registration files; storage of voter registration records.

The voter registration files shall contain copies of the applications for registration completed by electors, which applications shall show the date of registration and signature of elector.

All records pertaining to voter registration shall be stored in an electronic format in the Statewide Elections Management System by the county registrar. The scanned applications shall be a legal document of voter registration and shall be retained in the Statewide Elections Management System.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-25 [Codes, 1892, § 3607; 1906, § 4113; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6747; 1930, § 6182; 1942, § 3210; Laws, 1952, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess, ch. 102, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 12, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 30; Laws, 1997, ch. 421, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-114.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 21 effective and in force from and after June 5, 2006, the date it was effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended and extended.

[Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after May 1, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).]

§ 23-15-115.
Transfer of voter registration necessitated by change in boundaries of legislative districts.

When a transfer of a voter registration is necessitated by any change in the boundaries of legislative districts, supervisors districts, voting precincts, or other similar boundaries, such information necessary to bring about such transfer may be secured by mail or otherwise. Necessary forms for the purposes of securing necessary information shall be prepared by the registrar.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-32 [Laws, 1978, ch. 393, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 31, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-117.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2016, ch. 430, § 22, effective January 1, 2017.

§23-15-117. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-45 [Codes, 1880, § 114; 1892, § 3617; 1906, § 4124; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6758; 1930, § 6191; 1942, § 3219; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 32, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-119. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-47 [Codes, 1880, § 115; 1892, § 3618; 1906, § 4125; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6759; 1930, § 6192; 1942, § 3220; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 33, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-121.
Loss or destruction of electronic voting record.

Should the electronic voting record of any county as maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System be lost or destroyed, the board of supervisors may adjudge the fact, and direct a new registration of the voters to be made; and the county registrar, being so directed, shall make a new registration, as herein provided, of the qualified electors of his or her county.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-49 [Codes, 1892, § 3619; 1906, § 4126; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6760; 1930, § 6193; 1942, § 3221; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 34; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-123.
Confusion of registration books.

If at any time the registration books of the county as maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System be or become in such confusion that a new registration is necessary to determine correctly the names of the qualified electors and the voting precinct of each, the board of supervisors shall order a new registration of voters to be made in like manner as provided for in Section 23-15-121.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-51 [Codes, 1892, § 3620; 1906, § 4127; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6761; 1930, § 6194; 1942, § 3222; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 35; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-125.
Form of pollbooks.

The pollbook of each voting precinct shall designate the voting precinct for which it is to be used, and shall be ruled in appropriate columns, with printed or written headings, as follows: date of registration; voter registration number; name of electors; date of birth; and a number of blank columns for the dates of elections. All qualified applicants who register with the registrar shall be entered in the Statewide Elections Management System. Only the names of those qualified applicants who register within thirty (30) days before an election shall appear on the pollbooks of the election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election. When county election commissioners determine that any elector is disqualified from voting, by reason of death, conviction of a disenfranchising crime, removal from the jurisdiction, or other legal cause, that fact shall be noted in the Statewide Elections Management System and the voter’s name shall be removed from the Statewide Elections Management System, the state’s voter roll and the county’s pollbooks. Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of electronic pollbooks.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-73 [Codes, 1892, § 3608; 1906, § 4114; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6748; 1930, § 6204; 1942, § 3232; Laws, 1962, ch. 574; Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 36; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 9; Laws, 2010, ch. 446, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-127.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-127. [Derived from 1942 Code § 3112 [Laws, 1934, ch. 308; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 37; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 10, eff June 5, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.)]

§ 23-15-129.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-129. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-74 [Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 38; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 11, eff June 5, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.)]

§ 23-15-131.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 21 effective and in force from and after June 5, 2006, the date it was effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended and extended.

[Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-75 [Codes, 1892, § 3621; Laws, 1906, § 4128; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6762; Laws, 1930, § 6205; Laws, 1942, § 3233; Laws, 1977 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 39, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-133.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-133. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-76 [Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 40, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-135.
Registrar to keep master voter roll and pollbooks and provide location for accepting applications for Mississippi Voter Identification Cards.

The master voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System of the several voting precincts of each county and the pollbooks heretofore in use shall be delivered to the registrar of the county, and they, together with the master voter roll and pollbooks hereafter made, shall be records of his or her office, and he or she shall carefully preserve the same as such; and after each election the pollbooks shall be speedily returned to the office of the registrar.

The registrar of each county shall provide a location in the registrar’s office at which he or she shall accept applications for Mississippi Voter Identification Cards in accordance with the Mississippi Constitution.

The registrar of each county shall enter into a Memorandum of Understanding, which is negotiated by the Secretary of State, with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety for the purpose of providing a Mississippi Voter Identification Card.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-77 [Codes, 1892, § 3610; 1906, § 4116; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6750; 1930, § 6206; 1942, § 3234; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 41; Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-137.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-137. [Laws, 1994, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 11; Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 12; Laws, 2006, ch. 585, § 1, eff from and after June 5, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section by Laws, 2006, ch. 574, § 12).]

§§ 23-15-139 and 23-15-140.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch 588, § 4, eff from and after July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the repeal of this section).

§23-15-139. [Laws, 1997, ch. 421, § 1.]

§23-15-140. [Laws, 1997, ch. 421, § 2.]